Wyoming, session 2025, HB0137.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:
Section 1. W.S. 1-39-103(a)(ix), 9-2-1013(d)(i),
9-2-2906(e)(v), 9-4-601(d)(iii), (v)(intro), (C), (vi),
(k)(i), (m)(i), (n)(i) and (o)(i), 9-4-605(j),
11-25-304(d)(ii), 21-2-202(a)(xvii)(A), 21-4-501(d),
21-4-504, 21-7-601(m), 21-7-701(j), 21-12-105(d),
21-13-303(c), 21-13-312(a)(intro) and (i), 21-13-313(d) and
(g), 21-13-316(a), 21-13-321(h), 21-13-336(a),
21-22-106(a)(intro), 35-21-102(a)(viii), 35-21-107(c),
39-13-109(c)(vi)(C) and 40-31-106(c)(iii) are amended to
read:
1-39-103. Definitions.
(a) As used in this act:
(ix) "This act" means W.S. 1-39-101 through
1-39-120 1-39-123.
9-2-1013. State budget; distribution of copies to
legislators; copies and reports of authorizations;
interfund loans.
(d) In addition to the items contained in subsection
(a) of this section and notwithstanding any other
recommendations made by the governor, the state budget
shall also include the governor's recommendations for
appropriations for the ensuing two (2) years, or if a
1

ORIGINAL HOUSE ENGROSSED
BILL NO. HB0137
ENROLLED ACT NO. 77, HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
supplemental budget request, the remainder of the budget
period, subject to the following:
(i) The state budget shall include the
governor's recommendations for a total appropriation from
the public school foundation program account and based upon
recommendations of the select school facilities committee
under W.S. 28-11-301, a total appropriation for school
capital construction purposes for both fiscal years;
9-2-2906. Office of the state chief information
officer and director; authority; duties of department.
(e) The department shall provide the following
services:
(v) The department shall annually apply to the
universal service administrative company under the federal
communications commission for amounts available to the
state under the schools and libraries program of the
universal service fund. All federal funds received by the
state from the schools and libraries program of the
universal service fund shall be deposited into the public
school foundation program account;
9-4-601. Distribution and use; funds, accounts,
cities and towns benefited; exception for bonus payments.
(d) Except as provided in subsections (k), (m), (n)
and (o) of this section, any revenue received under
subsection (a) of this section in excess of two hundred
million dollars ($200,000,000.00) shall be distributed as
follows:
2

ORIGINAL HOUSE ENGROSSED
BILL NO. HB0137
ENROLLED ACT NO. 77, HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
(iii) Subject to paragraphs (v), (vi) and (viii)
of this subsection, one-third (1/3) to the public school
foundation program account;
(v) From the amounts which would otherwise be
distributed to the public school foundation program account
under paragraph (iii) of this subsection, amounts shall be
deposited to the excellence in higher education endowment
fund and the Hathaway student scholarship endowment fund
created by W.S. 9-4-204(u)(vi) and (vii) in accordance with
and subject to the requirements of this paragraph. The
amounts specified in this paragraph shall be reduced as the
state treasurer determines necessary to ensure that as of
July 1 of each fiscal year, there is an unobligated,
unencumbered balance of one hundred million dollars
($100,000,000.00) within the public school foundation
program account. Distributions under this paragraph shall
be as follows:
(C) After the amounts specified in
subparagraphs (A) and (B) of this paragraph are deposited
to the appropriate fund, remaining funds shall be deposited
pursuant to paragraph (vi) of this subsection and then to
the public school foundation program account as provided in
paragraph (iii) of this subsection.
(vi) From the amounts which would otherwise be
distributed to the public school foundation program account
under paragraph (iii) of this subsection and paragraphs
(k)(i), (m)(i), (n)(i) and (o)(i) of this section, there is
annually appropriated to the common school permanent fund
reserve account the amount determined under W.S.
9-4-719(g). The appropriation shall be credited to the
account as provided in W.S. 9-4-719(g);
3

ORIGINAL HOUSE ENGROSSED
BILL NO. HB0137
ENROLLED ACT NO. 77, HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
(k) For the period beginning March 15, 2018 for
fiscal years 2018, 2019 and 2020, any revenue received
under subsection (a) of this section in excess of five
hundred million dollars ($500,000,000.00) shall be
distributed as follows:
(i) For fiscal years 2018 and 2019, two-thirds
(2/3) and for fiscal year 2020 one-half (1/2) to the public
school foundation program account; and
(m) For fiscal year 2021, any revenue received under
subsection (a) of this section in excess of four hundred
eighty-five million five hundred thousand dollars
($485,500,000.00) and for fiscal year 2022, any revenue
received under subsection (a) of this section in excess of
five hundred million eight hundred thousand dollars
($500,800,000.00) shall be distributed as follows:
(i) One-half (1/2) to the public school
foundation program account; and
(n) For fiscal year 2023, any revenue received under
subsection (a) of this section in excess of four hundred
fifty-nine million dollars ($459,000,000.00) and for fiscal
year 2024, any revenue received under subsection (a) of
this section in excess of four hundred twenty-nine million
two hundred thousand dollars ($429,200,000.00) shall be
distributed as follows:
(i) Forty percent (40%) to the public school
foundation program account; and
(o) For fiscal year 2025, any revenue received under
subsection (a) of this section in excess of five hundred
forty-nine million four hundred thousand dollars
4

ORIGINAL HOUSE ENGROSSED
BILL NO. HB0137
ENROLLED ACT NO. 77, HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
($549,400,000.00) and for fiscal year 2026, any revenue
received under subsection (a) of this section in excess of
five hundred thirty million two hundred thousand dollars
($530,200,000.00) shall be distributed as follows:
(i) Forty percent (40%) to the public school
foundation program account; and
9-4-605. Distribution and use; capital construction
projects and bonds; purposes.
(j) Unless otherwise specifically prohibited by law,
all capital construction projects or acquisition of
personal property within the projects for which funds are
appropriated by the legislature may be constructed or
acquired through the issuance of revenue bonds under this
section. To the extent bonds are utilized, appropriations
for those projects made by the legislature shall be
transferred to the common school account provided by W.S.
9-4-310(a)(vii) and shall be invested separate and apart
from pooled investments. Notwithstanding the provisions of
W.S. 21-13-301, income and earnings from this investment
shall be periodically credited to the public school
foundation program account.
11-25-304. Required permits and licenses; applicable
fees; tax imposition; taxation rate; distribution.
(d) Taxes shall be calculated and paid on a weekly
basis based on the net proceeds earned during the prior
week on skill based amusement games. On a weekly basis, the
vendor shall remit to the commission an amount equivalent
to twenty percent (20%) of the net proceeds earned during
the prior week on the vendor's skill based amusement games.
The taxes imposed under this subsection may be prepaid as
5

ORIGINAL HOUSE ENGROSSED
BILL NO. HB0137
ENROLLED ACT NO. 77, HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
provided by rule of the commission. The commission shall
remit these monies to the state treasurer for deposit in
the commission gaming account and for distribution of the
tax as follows:
(ii) Forty-five percent (45%) to the public
school foundation program account;
21-2-202. Duties of the state superintendent.
(a) In addition to any other duties assigned by law,
the state superintendent shall:
(xvii) Include in the agency's budget request:
(A) Recommendations to the governor for
appropriations from the public school foundation program
account and for appropriations to the account necessary to
fund payments to school districts as required by law; and
21-4-501. Payment of tuition for children resident in
districts which maintain no high school; admission of
children to high schools in other districts; state board
approval for out-of-state placements; duties of admitting
districts; tuition amount.
(d) Subject to state board approval if an
out-of-state placement as required under subsection (a) of
this section, nonunified school districts shall be
reimbursed from the public school foundation program
account for tuition paid under subsection (a) of this
section as if the district's total foundation program
amount for that year as computed under W.S. 21-13-309(p)
was increased by the amount of the tuition paid during the
preceding year.
6

ORIGINAL HOUSE ENGROSSED
BILL NO. HB0137
ENROLLED ACT NO. 77, HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
21-4-504. Cost of maintaining pupil attending school
outside district of residence.
A school district admitting a pupil from a nonunified
school district in the state under W.S. 21-4-501 or
providing for the enrollment of a pupil in a school within
a school district in another state under W.S. 21-4-505
shall, in accordance with rules and regulations of the
state department, be reimbursed from the public school
foundation program account for expenditures for maintaining
that pupil in the admitting district for any length of time
the pupil is required to reside in the admitting district.
Reimbursement under this subsection shall be subject to and
reported in accordance with rule and regulation of the
state department and shall be administered as if the
district's total foundation program amount computed under
W.S. 21-13-309(p) is increased by the amount of the
expenditure for maintenance during the preceding year for a
school district admitting a pupil from a nonunified school
district in the state under W.S. 21-4-501 and in the
current school year for pupils attending a school in
another state under W.S. 21-4-505.
21-7-601. Wyoming teacher shortage loan repayment
program; eligibility criteria; procedures; program
reporting.
(m) Cash repayment of loans and interest thereon
shall be credited to the public school foundation program
account.
21-7-701. Wyoming adjunct professor loan repayment
program; eligibility criteria; procedures; program
reporting.
7

ORIGINAL HOUSE ENGROSSED
BILL NO. HB0137
ENROLLED ACT NO. 77, HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
(j) Cash repayment of loans and interest thereon
shall be credited to the public school foundation program
account.
21-12-105. Career and technical education
demonstration project grants; application; criteria;
limitations.
(d) Not later than August 15 of the applicable school
year and following review of applications submitted under
this section, the department shall notify applicant
districts of its decision and shall provide each applicant
district a written statement of reasons for approving or
denying the application. If the application is approved,
the department shall award the grant from amounts made
available by legislative appropriation within the public
school foundation program account for purposes of this
section.
21-13-303. Levy of state tax; disposition of funds;
reduction of mill levy.
(c) Between July 1 and July 10 of each year the state
auditor and the state treasurer shall determine if the
unobligated average daily general fund balance over the
preceding fiscal year exceeds twenty percent (20%) of the
amount of the general fund appropriations for the present
biennium. If the unobligated average daily general fund
balance exceeds twenty percent (20%) of the amount
appropriated, the excess is appropriated and shall be
transferred into the public school foundation program
account as soon as possible. The auditor and treasurer
shall immediately notify the state board of equalization of
the amount to be transferred. Based on the current assessed
8

ORIGINAL HOUSE ENGROSSED
BILL NO. HB0137
ENROLLED ACT NO. 77, HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
valuation of the state, the board shall compute the
estimated amount of revenue to be produced by a twelve (12)
mill levy, subtract the amount transferred to the public
school foundation program account and then compute the mill
levy necessary to produce the difference. The board shall
certify the recomputed mill levy to the county assessors to
be levied and collected in lieu of the twelve (12) mill
state levy for the next tax year.
21-13-312. Prorating payments when income from
foundation account insufficient.
(a) To preserve the integrity of the foundation
account for the biennium and so that payments can be made
during the full school year for each year of the biennium,
if it appears to the state superintendent that the income
available to the foundation program account is not
sufficient to meet the payments as provided by law:
(i) The state superintendent shall determine a
uniform percentage by which the amount guaranteed to each
district under W.S. 21-13-309 shall be reduced so that
available revenues in the foundation program account for
that school year are as nearly as possible equal to the
amount necessary to fund payments to districts under W.S.
21-13-313; and
21-13-313. Distribution of funds from foundation
account; property tax and cash reserve adjustment;
regulations.
(d) On or before August 15 of the succeeding fiscal
year, each school district shall report the amount of
revenue it received during the preceding fiscal year
attributable to levies provided by W.S. 21-13-102(a)(i)(A)
9

ORIGINAL HOUSE ENGROSSED
BILL NO. HB0137
ENROLLED ACT NO. 77, HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
and (ii)(A) and 21-13-201 regardless of the assessment
year, but not to include assessments from years prior to
July 1, 1991. If those revenues reported are less than the
revenues estimated under W.S. 21-13-310(a)(i) and (ii) for
that fiscal year, as applicable, and if the district's
total revenues computed under W.S. 21-13-310 for that
fiscal year continue to be less than the total foundation
program amount computed under W.S. 21-13-309, the school
district shall be paid the difference by October 15 from
the public school foundation program account. No amount in
excess of the total foundation program amount computed for
any district for that fiscal year shall be paid from the
public school foundation program account for purposes of
this subsection. Any amount paid under this subsection
shall not thereafter be relevant to or used for future
foundation program calculations. If those revenues reported
are greater than the revenues estimated under W.S.
21-13-310(a)(i) and (ii) for that fiscal year, as
applicable, the excess shall be included as revenues of the
district under W.S. 21-13-310 in computing the foundation
entitlement for the succeeding fiscal year.
(g) In addition to subsections (b) and (c) of this
section, the state superintendent shall, for any district
subject to W.S. 21-13-102(b) as determined by the
department for any school year, or for any district not
subject to W.S. 21-13-102(b) whose entitlement amount
determined under W.S. 21-13-311(a) for any school year is
equal to or less than twenty percent (20%) of the
foundation program amount computed under W.S. 21-13-309(p),
and upon demonstration by the district of financial need as
documented by cash flow analysis, provide payments from the
public school foundation program account in an amount not
to exceed one-fifth (1/5) of the foundation program amount
computed for that district for that school year in
10

ORIGINAL HOUSE ENGROSSED
BILL NO. HB0137
ENROLLED ACT NO. 77, HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
accordance with W.S. 21-13-309. The computed amount shall
be paid to each eligible district on or before September 1
based upon tentative computations under W.S. 21-13-309, for
which the department may use fiscal information available
from foundation program computations for the previous
school year in the manner provided under subsection (b) of
this section. Any district receiving a payment under this
subsection shall repay the public school foundation program
account not later than December 15 of that school year.
21-13-316. Interfund borrowing.
(a) The state treasurer may utilize interfund loans
to the public school foundation program account to ensure
statutory payments are made when dedicated revenues are not
yet received. Interfund loans under this subsection may be
made from the legislative stabilization reserve account or,
to the extent insufficient funds exist in the legislative
stabilization reserve account, the common school account
within the permanent land fund. Any interfund loans
executed pursuant to this section shall be repaid in whole
or in part periodically as soon as public school foundation
program account revenues permit.
21-13-321. Special education; amount provided for
special education programs and services; district reporting
requirements; billing for Medicaid authorized school based
services.
(h) Beginning July 1, 2022, each school district with
Medicaid eligible students receiving special education
programs and services, as calculated by the department of
education pursuant to subsection (j) of this section, may
bill the department of health for the costs of any special
education program and service covered under W.S.
11

ORIGINAL HOUSE ENGROSSED
BILL NO. HB0137
ENROLLED ACT NO. 77, HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
42-4-103(a)(xxxiv) through (xxxvi) provided to the
district's students. The department of health shall provide
payment to each eligible school district that has billed
the department of health as soon as reasonably practical
for the costs of approved services. By September 1 of each
school year, each school district shall remit to the
department of education all funds received during the prior
school year from the department of health for billed
services. The department of education shall remit all funds
received under this subsection to the state treasurer for
deposit in the public school foundation program account.
21-13-336. Education costs of children certified by
the department of health for treatment in psychiatric
residential treatment facilities.
(a) The department of education using federal or
public school foundation program account funds as
appropriated by the legislature, or both, shall pay for the
allowable education costs of children placed in psychiatric
residential treatment facilities where a fee is charged and
the department of health has determined the placement is
medically necessary for purposes of benefit eligibility
under W.S. 42-4-103(a)(xvi). This section shall not apply
to children eligible for services under W.S. 21-13-315. No
district shall receive funds, either directly or
indirectly, from any facility receiving payment under this
section for providing educational programs and services to
children placed and residing in the facility. No
psychiatric residential treatment facility shall receive
funds for educational services under this section unless
certified by the department of health for purposes of
providing medical services and approved by the department
of education under the requirements of this section.
12

ORIGINAL HOUSE ENGROSSED
BILL NO. HB0137
ENROLLED ACT NO. 77, HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
21-22-106. Distribution of trust funds available to
public schools; innovative program grants; criteria.
(a) From amounts appropriated by the legislature, the
department of education shall annually distribute funds not
to exceed two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000.00)
from the public school foundation program account to school
districts as innovative program grants to fund programs
providing innovation in or improvement to public education
through the creation of new, different and improved
educational opportunities in elementary or secondary
schools, including:
35-21-102. Definitions.
(a) As used in this act:
(viii) "This act" means W.S. 35-21-101 through
35-21-111 35-21-112.
35-21-107. Emergency assistance by law enforcement
officers; limited liability.
(c) Any law enforcement officer responding to a
request for assistance under this act is immune from civil
liability when complying with the request, providing
provided that the officer acts in good faith and in a
reasonable manner.
39-13-109. Taxpayer remedies.
(c) Refunds. The following shall apply:
(vi) Each county shall have the option to
implement a county-optional property tax refund program
13

ORIGINAL HOUSE ENGROSSED
BILL NO. HB0137
ENROLLED ACT NO. 77, HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
that is in addition to the program established under
paragraph (v) of this subsection, subject to the adoption
of rules as required by subparagraph (H) of this paragraph.
The following shall apply to a county-optional property tax
refund program implemented under this paragraph:
(C) Except as provided in subparagraph (D)
of this paragraph, any person in the participating county
shall qualify for a refund in the amount specified under
this paragraph if any ad valorem tax due upon the person's
principal residence in the county for the preceding
calendar year was timely paid and if the person's gross
income including the total household income of which the
person is a member does not exceed an amount as determined
by the county, which shall not exceed one hundred
sixty-five percent (165%) of the median gross household
income for the county, as determined annually by the
economic analysis division of the department of
administration and information. As used in this
subparagraph "gross income" shall have the same meaning as
defined by department rules promulgated underparagraph
under paragraph (v) of this subsection. Gross income shall
be verified by federal income tax returns, which shall
accompany the application for refund, if federal income tax
returns were required and filed, or by whatever other means
necessary as determined by the county through rules;
40-31-106. Wyoming stable token accounts.
(c) The Wyoming stable token administration account
is created. Funds received into the account from any source
shall be retained, expended or transferred and are
continuously appropriated according to the following
priority:
14

ORIGINAL HOUSE ENGROSSED
BILL NO. HB0137
ENROLLED ACT NO. 77, HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
(iii) Any remainder shall be distributed on a
quarterly basis, into the public school foundation program
account created by W.S. 21-13-306(a).
Section 2. 2025 House Enrolled Act No. 54, Section 2
is amended to read:
Section 2. The livestock board shall report
to the joint agriculture, state and public lands
and water resources interim committee not later
than September 30, 2025 regarding the status of
the standard notification protocol required by
W.S. 11-18-103(a)(xiii), as created by section 1
of this section act. The report shall include
suggestions for legislation that may be necessary
to implement the protocol.
Section 3. W.S. 36-2-108(b)(xi)(E), as created by 2025
Senate Enrolled Act No. 62, is amended to read:
36-2-108. Appointment of state forester;
qualifications; duties.
(b) The state forester shall:
(xi) Maintain wildland and forestry fire control
programs including, but not limited to:
(E) Establishing standards and regulations
for privately contracted private wildland fire resources
operating in Wyoming. As used in this subparagraph,
"privately contracted private wildland fire resources"
includes services retained by insurers for prevention and
suppression activities on insured properties.
15

ORIGINAL HOUSE ENGROSSED
BILL NO. HB0137
ENROLLED ACT NO. 77, HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
Section 4. 2025 Senate Enrolled Act No. 59, Section 4
is amended to read:
Section 4. During the 2025 interim, the
management audit committee of the Wyoming
legislature shall study this act and its relation
to existing statutory provisions concerning the
legislative role in the administrative rule
review process. The management audit committee
shall receive all assistance requested from the
legislative service office and executive branch
agencies while conducting the study required by
this section. Not later than December 1, 2025,
the management audit committee shall report to
the management council on the conclusion of the
study required by this section. The report shall
include, but not necessarily be limited to, the
appropriate legislative role in overseeing
administrative rules and the regulatory impact
thereof, the legislative staff required to assist
the legislature in completing this role, which
legislative body should oversee this role when
the legislature is not in session and any
statutory changes necessary to effectuate the
findings in the report. The management audit
committee or management council may sponsor
legislation during the 2026 budget session to
effectuate the findings of the report. Funding
for legislative staff necessary to effectuate the
findings of the report required by this section
may be included in the 2025 2026 legislative
appropriations bill.
16

ORIGINAL HOUSE ENGROSSED
BILL NO. HB0137
ENROLLED ACT NO. 77, HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
Section 5. This act is effective July 1, 2025.
(END)
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
Governor
TIME APPROVED: _________
DATE APPROVED: _________
I hereby certify that this act originated in the House.
Chief Clerk
17